Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2343.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5102XS (5) 91 th/ns S.F. 2343 Section 1. Section 321.34, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 11E. Gadsden flag plates. 3 a. Upon application and payment of the proper fees, the 4 director may issue Gadsden flag plates to the owner of a 5 motor vehicle subject to registration under section 321.109, 6 subsection 1, autocycle, motor truck, motor home, multipurpose 7 vehicle, motorcycle, trailer, or travel trailer. 8 b. Gadsden flag plates shall be designed by the department. 9 The background shall be yellow at the top and bottom, with the 10 color fading into white in the center. The plateâs numbers 11 and letters shall be black. The left side of the plate shall 12 depict a black and white rattlesnake coiled on green grass. 13 The image depicting the coiled rattlesnake shall be at least 14 three inches tall and two inches wide. The phrase âDonât Tread 15 on Meâ shall appear at the bottom of the plate. 16 c. The special Gadsden flag fee for letter-number designated 17 Gadsden flag plates is fifty dollars. An applicant may obtain 18 personalized Gadsden flag plates upon payment of the fee for 19 personalized plates as provided in subsection 5, which is in 20 addition to the special Gadsden flag fee. Personalized plates 21 authorized by this subsection shall be limited to no more 22 than five numerals, letters, or combinations of numerals and 23 letters. 24 d. (1) The fees collected by the director under this 25 subsection shall be paid monthly to the treasurer of state and 26 deposited in the road use tax fund. 27 (2) The treasurer of state shall transfer monthly from 28 the statutory allocations fund created under section 321.145, 29 subsection 2, to the general fund of the state the amount of 30 the special fees collected in the previous month for Gadsden 31 flag plates. Such moneys are appropriated as follows: 32 (a) Fifty percent is appropriated to the natural resource 33 commission to distribute in the form of shooting sports 34 development grants to applicants for the creation of new 35 -1- LSB 5102XS (5) 91 th/ns 1/ 6 S.F. 2343 shooting ranges and improvement of existing shooting ranges 1 and facilities. The natural resource commission shall not 2 award a grant to an applicant unless the applicant allows 3 students enrolled at a public or private school to participate 4 in shooting sports at the applicantâs range or facility. The 5 natural resource commission shall give first consideration 6 to any applicant who has agreed to allow a public or private 7 school sports shooting team to use the applicantâs range 8 or facility. The natural resource commission shall adopt 9 rules pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this subparagraph 10 division. 11 (b) Fifty percent is appropriated to the department of 12 homeland security and emergency management to distribute in 13 the form of grants to school districts to be used for school 14 infrastructure described in section 423F.3, subsection 6, 15 paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (4) or (5). The department of 16 homeland security and emergency management shall adopt rules 17 pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this subparagraph 18 division. 19 (3) Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated under 20 subparagraph (2) shall not revert to the general fund of the 21 state. 22 e. Upon receipt of the special registration plates, the 23 applicant shall surrender the current registration plates to 24 the county treasurer. The county treasurer shall validate 25 the special registration plates in the same manner as regular 26 registration plates are validated under this section. The 27 annual special Gadsden flag fee for letter-number designated 28 plates is fifty dollars which shall be paid in addition to 29 the regular annual registration fee. The annual fee for 30 personalized Gadsden flag plates is five dollars which shall be 31 paid in addition to the annual special Gadsden flag fee and the 32 regular annual registration fee. The annual special Gadsden 33 flag fee shall be credited as provided under paragraph âdâ . 34 f. The department shall not condition the issuance of 35 -2- LSB 5102XS (5) 91 th/ns 2/ 6 S.F. 2343 Gadsden flag plates on the receipt of any number of orders for 1 Gadsden flag plates. 2 Sec. 2. Section 321.37, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 3. It is unlawful for the The owner of a vehicle to shall 5 not place any a frame around or over the a registration plate 6 which does not permit full view of all numerals and letters 7 printed on the registration plate , other than the name of the 8 county . 9 Sec. 3. Section 321.166, subsections 2 and 9, Code 2026, are 10 amended to read as follows: 11 2. Every registration plate or pair of plates shall display 12 a registration plate number which shall consist of alphabetical 13 or numerical characters or a combination thereof and the name 14 of this state, which may be abbreviated. Every registration 15 plate issued by the county treasurer shall display the name 16 of the county, including any plate issued pursuant to section 17 321.34 , except Pearl Harbor and purple heart registration 18 plates issued prior to January 1, 1997; and collegiate, fire 19 fighter, and medal of honor , and Gadsden flag registration 20 plates. Special truck registration plates shall display the 21 word âspecialâ. The department may adopt rules to implement 22 this subsection . 23 9. Special registration plates issued pursuant to section 24 321.34 , other than gold star, medal of honor, collegiate, fire 25 fighter, natural resources, blackout, and flying our colors , 26 and Gadsden flag registration plates, shall be consistent with 27 the design and color of regular registration plates but shall 28 provide a space on a portion of the plate for the purpose of 29 allowing the placement of a distinguishing processed emblem or 30 an organization decal. Special registration plates shall also 31 comply with the requirements for regular registration plates 32 as provided in this section to the extent the requirements are 33 consistent with the section authorizing a particular special 34 vehicle registration plate. 35 -3- LSB 5102XS (5) 91 th/ns 3/ 6 S.F. 2343